Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2503
Advertisement or written solicitation; comparison authorized.

It is not a violation of section 8-2501 or 8-2502 for a person in an advertisement or written solicitation for products or services to use the name, trade name, logo, or symbol of a financial institution without the statement described in section 8-2501 or 8-2502, if that use is exclusively part of a comparison of like products or services in which the person clearly and conspicuously identifies itself. Nothing in section 8-2501 or 8-2502 shall be deemed or interpreted to alter or modify the trade name and trademark laws of this state.

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 27.